test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-cuacc_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - čuäcc e-stem sipuli: # Noun - full paradigm
     čuäcc+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: čuäcc
     čuäcc+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: čuäʒʒ
     čuäcc+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: čuäʒʒ
     čuäcc+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: čuåcˈcu
     čuäcc+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: čuäʒʒast
     čuäcc+N+Sg+Com+Indef: čuäʒʒain
     čuäcc+N+Ess+Indef: čuäccan
     čuäcc+N+Par+Indef: čuäccad
     čuäcc+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [čuäʒʒtaa, čuäʒʒtää]
     čuäcc+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: čuäʒʒ
     čuäcc+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: čuäʒʒai
     čuäcc+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: čuäʒʒaid
     čuäcc+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: čuäʒʒaid
     čuäcc+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: čuäʒʒain
     čuäcc+N+Pl+Com+Indef: čuäʒʒaivuiʹm
     čuäcc+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [čuäʒʒaitaa, čuäʒʒaitää]
